hr-HR: Usluge: Automobilske usluge; Građevinske usluge; Poslovne usluge; Usluge zabave i rekreacije; Usluge vezane za zaštitu okoliša; Usluge hrane i pića; Usluge unaprjeđivanja doma; Osobne usluge; Profesionalne usluge
pt-BR: Serviços: Serviços automotivos; Serviços de construção e edificação; Serviços prestados às empresas; Serviços de entretenimento e recreação; Serviços ambientais; Serviços de alimentos e bebidas; Serviços de reforma residencial; Serviços pessoais; Serviços profissionais
ru: Услуги: Услуги для автомобилистов; Строительные услуги; Услуги для бизнеса; Услуги по организации отдыха и развлечений; Экологические услуги; Услуги в сфере продуктов питания и напитков; Ремонт квартир и домов; Персональные услуги; Профессиональные услуги
ko: 서비스: 자동차 서비스; 건축/건설 서비스; 기업 서비스; 엔터테인먼트/레크리에이션 서비스; 환경 서비스; 식음료 서비스; 주택 개조 서비스; 개인 서비스; 전문 서비스
es: Servicios: Servicios de automoción; Servicios de edificación y construcción; Servicios empresariales; Servicios de entretenimiento y ocio; Servicios ambientales; Servicios de alimentos y bebidas; Servicios de mejoras para el hogar; Servicios personales; Servicios profesionales
sk-SK: Servis: Servis automobilov; Stavebníctvo a výstavba; Obchodné služby; Zábavné a rekreačné služby; Environmentálne služby; Služby pre potraviny a nápoje; Služby renovácie domácnosti; Osobné služby; Profesionálne služby
nl: Diensten: Automobieldiensten; Bouwdiensten; Bedrijfsdiensten; Entertainment- en recreatiediensten; Milieudiensten; Voedings- en drankenservices; Woningverbeteringsdiensten; Persoonlijke diensten; Professionele diensten
hu: Szolgáltatások: Autóipari szolgáltatások; Építőipari szolgáltatások; Üzleti szolgáltatások; Szórakoztatási és szabadidős szolgáltatások; Környezetvédelmi szolgáltatások; Étel- és italszolgáltatások; Lakásfelújítási szolgáltatások; Személyes szolgáltatások; Szakmai szolgáltatások
sv: Tjänster: Biltjänster; Bygg- och anläggningstjänster; Företagstjänster; Underhållnings- och rekreationstjänster; Miljötjänster; Mat- och dryckestjänster; Hemförbättringstjänster; Personliga tjänster; Professionella tjänster
vi: Dịch vụ: Dịch vụ ô tô; Dịch vụ chế tạo & xây dựng; Dịch vụ kinh doanh; Dịch vụ giải trí & tiêu khiển; Dịch vụ môi trường; Dịch vụ ăn uống; Dịch vụ sửa chữa nhà cửa; Dịch vụ cá nhân; Dịch vụ nghề nghiệp
tr: Servisler: Otomotiv Servisleri; İnşaat ve İnşaat Hizmetleri; İş Hizmetleri; Eğlence ve Rekreasyon Hizmetleri; Çevresel Hizmetler; Yiyecek ve içecek hizmetleri; Ev Tadilatı Hizmetleri; Kişisel Hizmetler; Profesyonel Hizmetler
de: Dienstleistungen: Automobildienstleistungen; Bau- & Konstruktionsdienstleistungen; Geschäftliche Dienstleistungen; Belustigungs- und Freizeitdienstleistungen; Umweltbezogene Dienstleistungen; Lebensmittel- & Getränkedienstleistungen; Heimwerkerdienste; Persönliche Dienstleistungen; Professionelle Dienste
bg-BG: Услуги: Автомобилни услуги; Строителни услуги и конструкции; Бизнес услуги; Услуги за развлечение и отдих; Екологични услуги; Услуги за храна и напитки; Услуги за подобряване на дома; Персонални услуги; Професионални услуги
sl-SI: Storitve: Avtomobilske storitve; Gradbene in gradbeniške storitve; Poslovne storitve; Razvedrilne in rekreacijske storitve; Okoljske storitve; Storitve za hrano in pijačo; Storitve za obnovo doma; Osebne storitve; Strokovne storitve
fi: Huollot: Autohuollot; Rakennus- ja rakentamispalvelut; Liikepalvelut; Viihde- ja virkistyspalvelut; Ympäristöpalvelut; Ruoka- ja juomapalvelut; Kodin kunnostuspalvelut; Henkilökohtaiset palvelut; Ammatilliset palvelut
zh-CN: 服务: 汽车服务; 建筑构造服务; 商业服务; 娱乐/休闲服务; 环境服务; 餐饮服务; 家居装修服务; 个人服务; 专业服务
zh-TW: 維修: 汽車維修; 營建服務; 商業服務; 娛樂休閒服務; 環境服務; 餐飲服務; 居家裝修服務; 個人服務; 專業服務
it: Servizi: Servizi automobilistici; Servizi per l'edilizia e le costruzioni; Servizi commerciali; Servizi di intrattenimento e ricreativi; Servizi ambientali; Servizi di ristorazione; Servizi di miglioramento domestico; Servizi personali; Servizi professionali
nb: Tjenester: Bilrelaterte tjenester; Bygg- og anleggstjenester; Forretningstjenester; Underholdnings- og rekreasjonstjenester; Miljøtjenester; Mat- og drikketjenester; Oppussingstjenester; Personlige tjenester; Profesjonelle tjenester
pl: Usługi: Usługi motoryzacyjne; Usługi budowlane i konstrukcyjne; Business Services; Usługi rozrywkowe i rekreacyjne; Usługi środowiskowe; Usługi gastronomiczne; Usługi renowacji domów; Usługi osobiste; Usługi profesjonalne
ro-RO: Servicii: Servicii auto; Servicii de construcții; Servicii pentru afaceri; Servicii de divertisment și recreere; Servicii de mediu; Servicii de alimentație publică; Servicii de renovare pentru locuințe; Servicii personale; Servicii profesionale
ja: サービス: 自動車保守点検; ビル・建造物の保守点検; ビジネスサービス; エンターテイメント・レクリエーションサービス; 環境サービス; 飲食サービス; 住宅改善サービス; パーソナルサービス; 専門サービス
pt-PT: Serviços: Serviços automóveis; Serviços de construção; Serviços empresariais; Serviços de entretenimento e recreação; Serviços ambientais; Serviços de restauração e bebidas; Serviços de renovação de casas; Serviços pessoais; Serviços profissionais
lt-LT: Paslaugos: Automobilių paslaugos; Statybos paslaugos; Verslo paslaugos; Pramogų ir poilsio paslaugos; Aplinkosaugos paslaugos; Maisto ir gėrimų paslaugos; Namų tobulinimo paslaugos; Asmeninės paslaugos; Profesionalios paslaugos
cs: Služby: Služby pro automobilový průmysl; Služby v oblasti stavebnictví; Firemní služby; Služby v oblasti zábavy a rekreace; Environmentální služby; Stravovací a nápojové služby; Služby v oblasti oprav a údržby domů; Osobní služby; Odborné služby
en: Services: Automotive Services; Building & Construction Services; Business Services; Entertainment & Recreation Services; Environmental Services; Food & Beverage Services; Home Improvement Services; Personal Services; Professional Services
da: Service: Bilservice; Bygge- og anlægsydelser; Virksomhedsservice; Underholdning og fritidstjenester; Miljøtjenester; Tjenester inden for mad og drikke; Boligforbedringstjenester; Personlige tjenester; Professionelle ydelser
th: บริการ: บริการด้านยานยนต์; บริการอาคารและการก่อสร้าง; บริการทางธุรกิจ; บริการด้านความบันเทิงและสันทนาการ; บริการด้านสิ่งแวดล้อม; บริการอาหารและเครื่องดื่ม; บริการปรับปรุงบ้าน; บริการส่วนบุคคล; บริการเฉพาะด้าน
fr: Services: Services automobiles; Services de bâtiment et de construction; Services d’entreprise; Services de divertissement et de loisirs; Services environnementaux; Services de restauration et de boissons; Services de rénovation d’habitat; Services personnels; Services professionnels
el: Υπηρεσίες: Υπηρεσίες αυτοκινήτου; Υπηρεσίες οικοδομής & κατασκευών; Υπηρεσίες επιχειρήσεων; Υπηρεσίες ψυχαγωγίας & αναψυχής; Περιβαλλοντικές υπηρεσίες; Υπηρεσίες τροφίμων και ποτών; Υπηρεσίες βελτίωσης κατοικιών; Προσωπικές υπηρεσίες; Επαγγελματικές υπηρεσίες